California statutes. Education Code
(d) The relationship of that behavior to the pupil’s academic and social functioning.

(e) The educationally relevant health and development, and medical findings, if any.

(f) For pupils with learning disabilities, whether there is such a discrepancy between achievement and ability that it cannot be corrected without special education and related services.

(g) A determination concerning the effects of environmental, cultural, or economic disadvantage, where appropriate.

(h) The need for specialized services, materials, and equipment for pupils with low incidence disabilities, consistent with guidelines established pursuant to Section 56136.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1334, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

56328.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter, a special education local plan area may utilize a schoolsite level and a regional level service, as provided for under Section 56336.2 as it read prior to July 28, 1980, to provide the services required by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 58.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

56329.

As part of the assessment plan given to parents or guardians pursuant to Section 56321, the parent or guardian of the pupil shall be provided with a written notice that shall include all of the following information:

(a) (1) Upon completion of the administration of tests and other assessment materials, an individualized education program team meeting, including the parent or guardian and his or her representatives, shall be scheduled, pursuant to Section 56341, to determine whether the pupil is an individual with exceptional needs as defined in Section 56026, and to discuss the assessment, the educational recommendations, and the reasons for these recommendations.

(2) In making a determination of eligibility under paragraph (1), a pupil shall not, pursuant to Section 1414(b)(5) of Title 20 of the United States Code, and Section 300.306(b) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, be determined to be an individual with exceptional needs if the determinant factor for the determination is one of the following in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, plus subparagraph (D):

(A) Lack of appropriate instruction in reading, including the essential components of reading instruction as defined in Section 6368(3) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(B) Lack of appropriate instruction in mathematics.

(C) Limited-English proficiency.

(D) If the pupil does not otherwise meet the eligibility criteria under Section 300.8(a) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) A copy of the assessment report and the documentation of determination of eligibility shall be given to the parent or guardian.

(b) A parent or guardian has the right to obtain, at public expense, an independent educational assessment of the pupil from qualified specialists, as defined by regulations of the board, if the parent or guardian disagrees with an assessment obtained by the public education agency, in accordance with Section 300.502 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations. A parent or guardian is entitled to only one independent educational assessment at public expense each time the public education agency conducts an assessment with which the parent or guardian disagrees. If a public education agency observed the pupil in conducting its assessment, or if its assessment procedures make it permissible to have in-class observation of a pupil, an equivalent opportunity shall apply to an independent educational assessment of the pupil in the pupil’s current educational placement and setting, and observation of an educational placement and setting, if any, proposed by the public education agency, regardless of whether the independent educational assessment is initiated before or after the filing of a due process hearing proceeding.

(c) The public education agency may initiate a due process hearing pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 56500) to show that its assessment is appropriate. If the final decision resulting from the due process hearing is that the assessment is appropriate, the parent or guardian maintains the right for an independent educational assessment, but not at public expense.

If the parent or guardian obtains an independent educational assessment at private expense, the results of the assessment shall be considered by the public education agency with respect to the provision of free appropriate public education to the child, and may be presented as evidence at a due process hearing pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 56500) regarding the child. If a public education agency observed the pupil in conducting its assessment, or if its assessment procedures make it permissible to have in-class observation of a pupil, an equivalent opportunity shall apply to an independent educational assessment of the pupil in the pupil’s current educational placement and setting, and observation of an educational placement and setting, if any, proposed by the public education agency, regardless of whether the independent educational assessment is initiated before or after the filing of a due process hearing proceeding.

(d) If a parent or guardian proposes a publicly financed placement of the pupil in a nonpublic school, the public education agency shall have an opportunity to observe the proposed placement and the pupil in the proposed placement, if the pupil has already been unilaterally placed in the nonpublic school by the parent or guardian. An observation conducted pursuant to this subdivision shall only be of the pupil who is the subject of the observation and shall not include the observation or assessment of any other pupil in the proposed placement. The observation or assessment by a public education agency of a pupil other than the pupil who is the subject of the observation pursuant to this subdivision may be conducted, if at all, only with the consent of the parent or guardian pursuant to this article. The results of an observation or assessment of any other pupil in violation of this subdivision shall be inadmissible in a due process or judicial proceeding regarding the free appropriate public education of that other pupil.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 454, Sec. 16.   Effective October 10, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

56330.

A local educational agency shall follow the procedures in Section 300.306(c) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations when interpreting assessment data for the purpose of determining if a child is an individual with exceptional needs under Section 56026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.4. Eligibility Criteria for Special Education and Related Services on the Basis of Other Health Impairment [56332. - 56332.]

56332.

The State Board of Education shall include “fetal alcohol spectrum disorder” in the definition of “other health impairment” in Section 3030 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 611, Sec. 1.   (SB 1016)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Eligibility Criteria for Special Education and Related Services on the Basis of Language and Speech Disorder or Specific Learning Disabilities [56333. - 56338.]

56333.

A pupil shall be assessed as having a language or speech disorder that makes the pupil eligible for special education and related services when the pupil demonstrates difficulty understanding or using language to such an extent that it adversely affects the pupil’s educational performance and cannot be corrected without special education and related services. In order to be eligible for special education and related services, difficulty in understanding or using language shall be assessed by a speech-language pathologist who determines that such difficulty results from any of the following disorders:

(a) Speech sound disorder, characterized by deficits in the pupil’s production of speech sounds that significantly interferes with communication and
 attracts adverse attention.

(b) Voice disorder, characterized by persistent, deficits in voice quality, pitch, intensity, or resonance. A medical examination shall be conducted, where appropriate.

(c) Fluency disorder, characterized by persistent deficits in the flow of verbal expression to such a degree that these difficulties adversely affect communication between the pupil and listener.

(d) Language disorder, characterized by inappropriate or inadequate acquisition, comprehension, or expression of language such that the pupil’s language performance level is found to be significantly below the language performance level of the pupil’s peers.

(e) Hearing impairment or deafness that contributes to or results in a language or speech disorder and
 significantly affects educational performance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 99.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

56334.

The state board shall include “phonological processing” in the description of basic psychological processes in Section 3030 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 647, Sec. 1.   (AB 1369)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

56335.

(a) The Superintendent shall develop program guidelines for dyslexia to be used to assist regular education teachers, special education teachers, and parents to
 identify and assess pupils with dyslexia, and to
 plan, provide, evaluate, and improve educational services to pupils with dyslexia. For purposes of this section, “educational services” means an evidence-based, multisensory, direct, explicit, structured, and sequential approach to instructing pupils who have dyslexia.

(b) The program guidelines shall include, but shall not be limited to, characteristics typical of pupils with dyslexia and
 strategies for their
 remediation, as well as information to assist educators in distinguishing between characteristics of dyslexia and characteristics of normal growth and development.

(c) In developing program guidelines pursuant to subdivision (a), the Superintendent shall consult with teachers, school administrators, other educational professionals, medical professionals, parents, and other professionals
 involved in the identification and education of pupils with dyslexia.

(d) The Superintendent shall complete the program guidelines in time for use no later than the beginning of the 2017–18 academic year.

(e) The Superintendent shall disseminate the program guidelines through the department’s Internet Web site and provide technical assistance regarding their use and implementation to parents, teachers, school administrators,
 and faculty members in teacher training programs of institutions of higher education.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 647, Sec. 2.   (AB 1369)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

56337.

(a) A specific learning disability, as defined in Section 1401(30) of Title 20 of the United States Code, means a disorder in one or more of the basic psychological processes involved in understanding or in using language, spoken or written, which may manifest itself in the imperfect ability to listen, think, speak, read, write, spell, or perform mathematical calculations. The term “specific learning disability” includes conditions such as perceptual disabilities, brain injury, minimal brain dysfunction, dyslexia, and developmental aphasia. That term does not include a learning problem that is primarily the result of visual, hearing, or motor disabilities, of intellectual disabilities, of emotional disturbance, or of environmental, cultural, or
 economic disadvantage.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law and pursuant to Section 1414(b)(6) of Title 20 of the United States Code, in determining whether a pupil has a specific learning disability as defined in subdivision (a), a local educational agency is not required to take into consideration whether a pupil has a severe discrepancy between achievement and intellectual ability in oral expression, listening comprehension, written expression, basic reading skill, reading comprehension, mathematical calculation, or mathematical reasoning.

(c) In determining whether a pupil has a specific learning disability, a local educational agency may use a process that determines if the pupil responds to scientific, research-based intervention as a part of the assessment procedures described in Section 1414(b)(2) and (3) of Title 20 of the United States Code and covered in Sections 300.307
 to 300.311, inclusive, of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 347, Sec. 34.   (SB 942)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

56337.5.

(a) A pupil who is assessed as being dyslexic and meets eligibility criteria specified in Section 56337 and paragraph (10) of subdivision (b) of Section 3030 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations for the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) category of specific learning disabilities is entitled to special education and related services.

(b) If a pupil who exhibits the characteristics of dyslexia or another related reading dysfunction is not found to be eligible for special education and related services pursuant to subdivision (a), the pupil’s instructional program shall be provided in the regular education program.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the program guidelines developed pursuant to Section 2 of Chapter 1501 of the Statutes of 1990, for specific learning disabilities, including dyslexia and other related disorders, be available for use by teachers and parents in order for them to have knowledge of the strategies that can be utilized with pupils for the remediation of the various types of specific learning disabilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 54.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

56338.

As used in Section 56337, “specific learning disability” includes, but is not limited to, disability within the function of vision which results in visual perceptual or visual motor dysfunction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1353, Sec. 57.   Effective September 30, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.6. Attention Deficit and Hyperactivity Disorders [56339. - 56339.]

56339.

(a) A pupil whose educational performance is adversely affected by a suspected or diagnosed attention deficit disorder or attention deficit hyperactivity disorder and demonstrates a need for special education and related services by meeting eligibility criteria specified in paragraph (4) or (9) of subdivision (b) of Section 3030 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations or Section 56337 and paragraph (10) of subdivision (b) of Section 3030 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations for the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) categories of “emotional disturbance,” “other health impairments,” or “specific learning disabilities,” is entitled to special education and related services.

(b) If a pupil with an attention deficit disorder or attention deficit hyperactivity disorder is not found to be eligible for special education and related services pursuant to subdivision (a), the pupil’s instructional program shall be provided in the regular education program.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that local educational agencies promote coordination between special education and regular education programs to ensure that all pupils, including those with attention deficit disorders or attention deficit hyperactivity disorders, receive appropriate instructional interventions.

(d) It is further the intent of the Legislature that regular education teachers and other personnel be trained to develop an awareness about attention deficit disorders and attention deficit hyperactivity disorders and the
 manifestations of those disorders, and the adaptations that can be implemented in regular education programs to address the instructional needs of pupils having these disorders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 55.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Instructional Planning and Individualized Education Program [56340. - 56348.]

56340.

A local educational agency shall initiate and conduct meetings for the purposes of developing, reviewing, and revising the individualized education program of each individual with exceptional needs in accordance with Section 300.323(c) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56340.1.

All instructional planning procedures for individuals with exceptional needs who are younger than three years of age shall be provided pursuant to Chapter 4.4 (commencing with Section 56425) and the California Early Intervention Services Act, Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1296, Sec. 14.5.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

56341.

(a) Each meeting to develop, review, or revise the individualized education program of an individual with exceptional needs shall be conducted by an individualized education program team.

(b) The individualized education program team shall include all of the following:

(1) One or both of the pupil’s parents, a representative selected by a parent, or both, in accordance with the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.).

(2) Not less than one regular education teacher of the pupil, if the pupil is, or may be, participating in the regular education environment. If more than one regular education teacher is providing instructional services to the individual with exceptional needs, one regular education teacher may be designated by the local educational agency to represent the others.

The regular education teacher of an individual with exceptional needs, to the extent appropriate, shall participate in the development, review, and revision of the pupil’s individualized education program, including assisting in the determination of appropriate positive behavioral interventions and supports, and other strategies for the pupil, and the determination of supplementary aids and services, program modifications, and supports for school personnel that will be provided for the pupil, consistent with Section 1414(d)(1)(A)(i)(IV) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(3) Not less than one special education teacher of the pupil, or if appropriate, not less than one special education provider of the pupil.

(4) A representative of the local educational agency who meets all of the following:

(A) Is qualified to provide, or supervise the provision of, specially designed instruction to meet the unique needs of individuals with exceptional needs.

(B) Is knowledgeable about the general education curriculum.

(C) Is knowledgeable about the availability of resources of the local educational agency.

(5) An individual who can interpret the instructional implications of the assessment results. The individual may be a member of the team described in paragraphs (2) to (6), inclusive.

(6) At the discretion of the parent, guardian, or the local educational agency, other individuals who have knowledge or special expertise regarding the pupil, including related services personnel, as appropriate. The determination of whether the individual has knowledge or special expertise regarding the pupil shall be made by the party who invites the individual to be a member of the individualized education program team.

(7) Whenever appropriate, the individual with exceptional needs.

(c) In accordance with Sections 300.308 and 300.310 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, for a pupil suspected of having a specific learning disability, at least one member of the individualized education program team shall be qualified to conduct individual diagnostic examinations of children, such as a school psychologist, speech-language pathologist, or remedial reading teacher. In accordance with Section 300.310 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, at least one team member shall observe the pupil’s academic performance and behavior in the areas of difficulty in the pupil’s learning environment, including in the regular classroom setting. In the case of a child who is less than schoolage or out of school, a team member shall observe the child in an environment appropriate for a child of that age.

(d) (1) The local educational agency shall invite an individual with exceptional needs to attend his or her individualized education program meeting if a purpose of the meeting will be the consideration of the postsecondary goals for the individual and the needed transition services for the individual to assist the individual in reaching those goals under subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 56345.

(2) If the individual with exceptional needs does not attend the individualized education program meeting, the local educational agency shall take steps to ensure that the individual’s preferences and interests are considered.

(3) To the extent appropriate, with the consent of the parents or an individual with exceptional needs who has reached the age of majority, in implementing the requirements of paragraph (1), the local educational agency shall invite a representative of a participating agency that is likely to be responsible for providing or paying for transition services.

(e) A local educational agency may designate another local educational agency member of the individualized education program team to serve also as the representative required pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) if the requirements of subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) are met.

(f) A member of the individualized education program team described in paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) shall not be required to attend an individualized education program meeting, in whole or in part, if the parent of the individual with exceptional needs and the local educational agency agree, in writing, that the attendance of the member is not necessary because the member’s area of the curriculum or related services is not being modified or discussed in the meeting.

(g) A member of the individualized education program team described in subdivision (f) may be excused from attending an individualized education program meeting, in whole or in part, when the meeting involves a modification to or discussion of the member’s area of the curriculum or related services, if both of the following occur:

(1) The parent, in writing, and the local educational agency consent to the excusal after conferring with the member.

(2) The member submits, in writing, to the parent and the individualized education program team input into the development of the individualized education program prior to the meeting.

(h) A parent’s agreement under subdivision (f) and consent under subdivision (g) shall be in writing.

(i) In the case of a child who was previously served under Chapter 4.4 (commencing with Section 56425), Early Education for Individuals with Exceptional Needs, or the California Early Intervention Services Act under Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the Government Code, an invitation to the initial individualized education program team meeting shall, at the request of the parent, be sent to the infants and toddlers with disabilities service coordinator, as described in Subchapter III (commencing with Section 1431) of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), or other representatives of the early education or early intervention system to assist with the smooth transition of services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 454, Sec. 17.   Effective October 10, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

56341.1.

(a) When developing each pupil’s individualized education program, the individualized education program team shall consider the following:

(1) The strengths of the pupil.

(2) The concerns of the parents or guardians for enhancing the education of the pupil.

(3) The results of the initial assessment or most recent assessment of the pupil.

(4) The academic, developmental, and functional needs of the child.

(b) The individualized education program team shall do the
 following:

(1) In the case of a pupil whose behavior impedes his or her learning or that of others, consider the use of positive behavioral interventions and supports, and other strategies, to address that behavior.

(2) In the case of a pupil with limited English proficiency, consider the language needs of the pupil as those needs relate to the pupil’s individualized education program.

(3) In the case of a pupil who is blind or visually impaired, provide for instruction in braille, and the use of braille, unless the individualized education program team determines, after an assessment of the pupil’s reading and writing skills, needs, and appropriate reading and writing media, including an assessment of the pupil’s future needs for instruction in braille or the use of braille, that instruction in braille or the use of
 braille is not appropriate for the pupil.

(4) Consider the communication needs of the pupil, and in the case of a pupil who is deaf or hard of hearing, consider the pupil’s language and communication needs, opportunities for direct communications with peers and professional personnel in the pupil’s language and communication mode, academic level, and full range of needs, including opportunities for direct instruction in the pupil’s language and communication mode.

(5) Consider whether the pupil requires assistive technology devices and services as defined in Section 1401(1) and (2) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(c) If, in considering the special factors described in subdivisions (a) and (b), the individualized education program team determines that a pupil needs a particular device or service, including an
 intervention, accommodation, or other program modification, in order for the pupil to receive a free appropriate public education, the individualized education program team shall include a statement to that effect in the pupil’s individualized education program.

(d) The individualized education program team shall review the pupil’s individualized education program periodically, but not less frequently than annually, to determine whether the annual goals for the pupil are being achieved, and revise the individualized education program, as appropriate, to address, among other matters, the following:

(1) A lack of expected progress toward the annual goals and in the general education curriculum, where appropriate.

(2) The results of any reassessment conducted pursuant to Section 56381.

(3) Information about the pupil provided to, or by, the parents or guardians, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 56381.

(4) The pupil’s anticipated needs.

(5) Any other relevant matter.

(e) A regular education teacher of the pupil, who is a member of the individualized education program team, shall participate, consistent with Section 1414(d)(1)(C) of Title 20 of the United States Code, in the review and revision of the individualized education program of the pupil.

(f) The parent or guardian shall have the right to present information to the individualized education program team in person or through a representative and the right to participate in meetings, relating to eligibility
 for special education and related services, recommendations, and program planning.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding Section 632 of the Penal Code, the parent or guardian or local educational agency shall have the right to audio record the proceedings of individualized education program team meetings. The parent or guardian or local educational agency shall notify the members of the individualized education program team of his, her, or its intent to audio record a meeting at least 24 hours prior to the meeting. If the local educational agency initiates the notice of intent to audio record a meeting and the parent or guardian objects or refuses to attend the meeting because it will be audio recorded, the meeting shall not be audio recorded.

(2) The Legislature hereby finds as follows:

(A) Under federal
 law, audio recordings made by a local educational agency are subject to the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g), and are subject to the confidentiality requirements of the regulations under Sections 300.610 to 300.626, inclusive, of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(B) Parents or guardians have the right, pursuant to Sections 99.10 to 99.22, inclusive, of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, to do all of the following:

(i) Inspect and review the audio recordings.

(ii) Request that the audio recordings be amended if the parent or guardian believes that they contain information that is inaccurate, misleading, or in violation of the rights of privacy or other rights of the individual with exceptional needs.

(iii) Challenge, in a hearing, information that the parent or guardian believes is inaccurate, misleading, or in violation of the individual’s rights of privacy or other rights.

(h) It is the intent of the Legislature that the individualized education program team meetings be nonadversarial and convened solely for the purpose of making educational decisions for the good of the individual with exceptional needs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 88, Sec. 28.   (AB 176)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

56341.2.

(a) In the case of a pupil with exceptional needs who has been placed in a group home, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 80001 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, by the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300, 601, or 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the district, special education local plan area, or county office shall invite to the individualized education program team meetings a representative of the group home.

(b) This section shall not be construed to delay the individualized education program process or to change the individualized education program team requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 56341.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 413, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

56341.5.

(a) A local educational agency convening a meeting of the individualized education program team shall take steps to ensure that no less than one of the parents or guardians of the individual with exceptional needs is present at each individualized education program meeting or are afforded the opportunity to participate.

(b) A parent or guardian shall be notified of the individualized education program meeting early enough to ensure an opportunity to attend.

(c) The individualized education program meeting shall be scheduled at a mutually agreed-upon time and place. The notice of the meeting under
 subdivision (b) shall indicate the purpose, time, and location of the meeting and who shall be in attendance. A parent or guardian also shall be informed in the notice of the right, pursuant to Section 300.322(b)(1)(ii) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, to bring other people to the meeting who have knowledge or special expertise regarding the individual with exceptional needs, and shall be informed of subdivision (i) of Section 56341 relating to the participation of the infants and toddlers with disabilities service coordinator under Subchapter III (commencing with Section 1431) of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) at the initial individualized education program team meeting for a child previously served under the Subchapter III program.

(d) As part of the participation of an
 individual with exceptional needs in the development of an individualized education program, as required by federal law, the individual with exceptional needs shall be allowed to provide confidential input to any representative of the individualized education program team.

(e) Pursuant to Section 1414(d)(1)(A)(i)(VIII) of Title 20 of the United States Code and Section 56345.1, if determined appropriate by the pupil’s individualized education program team, beginning when the pupil starts their high school
 experience or not later than the first individualized education program to be in effect when the pupil is 16 years of age or younger, as appropriate, the meeting notice also shall indicate that a purpose of the meeting will be the consideration of the
 postsecondary goals and transition services for the individual, and the meeting notice shall indicate that the individual with exceptional needs is invited to attend. If the pupil does not attend the individualized education program meeting, the local educational agency shall take steps to ensure that the preferences and interests of the pupil are considered in accordance with Section 300.321(b)(2) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(f) The local educational agency, to the extent appropriate, with the consent of the parents or the individual with exceptional needs who has reached the age of majority, and in accordance with Section
 300.321(b)(3) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, shall invite a representative of any participating agency that is likely to be responsible for providing or paying for transition services.

(g) Pursuant to Section 300.322(c) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, if no parent or guardian can attend the meeting, the local educational agency shall use other methods to ensure parent or guardian participation, including individual or conference telephone calls, and consistent with Section 300.328 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the parent or guardian and the local educational agency may agree to use alternative means of meeting participation.

(h) A meeting may be conducted without a parent or guardian in attendance if the local educational agency
 is unable to convince the parent or guardian that the parent or guardian should attend. In this event, the local educational agency shall maintain a record of its attempts to arrange a mutually agreed-upon time and place, such as:

(1) Detailed records of telephone calls made or attempted and the results of those calls.

(2) Copies of correspondence sent to the parent or guardian and any responses received.

(3) Detailed records of visits made to the home or place of employment of the parent or guardian and the results of those visits.

(i) The local educational agency shall take any action necessary to ensure that the parent or guardian understands the
 proceedings at a meeting, including arranging for an interpreter for parents or guardians with deafness or whose native language is a language other than English.

(j) The local educational agency shall give the parent or guardian a copy of the individualized education program, at no cost to the parent or guardian.

(k) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 901, Sec. 4.   (AB 438)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative July 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

56342.

(a) The individualized education program team shall review the assessment results, determine eligibility, determine the content of the individualized education program, consider local transportation policies and criteria developed pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 56195.8, and make program placement recommendations.

(b) In determining the program placement of an individual with exceptional needs, a local educational agency shall ensure that the placement decisions and the child’s placement are made in accordance with Sections 300.114 to 300.118, inclusive, of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 46.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56342.1.

Before a local educational agency places an individual with exceptional needs in, or refers an individual to, a nonpublic, nonsectarian school, the district, special education local plan area, or county office of education shall initiate and conduct a meeting to develop an individualized education program in accordance with Sections 56341.1 and 56345 and in accordance with Section 300.325(a) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations. An individual with exceptional needs shall not be referred to, or placed in, a nonpublic, nonsectarian school unless his or her individualized education program specifies that the placement is appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 571, Sec. 4.   (SB 121)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

56342.5.

A local educational agency shall ensure that the parent of each individual with exceptional needs is a member of any group that makes decisions on the educational placement of the individual with exceptional needs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56343.

An individualized education program team shall meet whenever any of the following occurs:

(a) A pupil has received an initial formal assessment. The team may meet when a pupil receives any subsequent formal assessment. 

(b) The pupil demonstrates a lack of anticipated progress. 

(c) The parent or teacher requests a meeting to develop, review, or revise the individualized education program.

(d) At least annually, to review the pupil’s progress, the individualized education program, including whether the annual goals for the pupil are being achieved, and the appropriateness of placement, and to make any necessary revisions. The individualized education program team conducting the annual review shall consist of those persons specified in subdivision (b) of Section 56341. Other individuals may participate in the annual review if they possess expertise or knowledge essential for the review.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 691, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

56343.5.

A meeting of an individualized education program team requested by a parent to review an individualized education program pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 56343 shall be held within 30 days, not counting days between the pupil’s regular school sessions, terms, or days of school vacation in excess of five schooldays, from the date of receipt of the parent’s written request. If a parent makes an oral request, the local educational agency shall notify the parent of the need for a written request and the procedure for filing a written request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56344.
